Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1406.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Solid and hazardous waste citizen suit study committee; membership; purpose; report; delayed repeal A. The solid and hazardous waste citizen suit study committee is established consisting of the following members: 1. Two members of the house of representatives natural resources, energy and water committee who are not members of the same political party and who are appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives.  The speaker of the house of representatives shall designate one of these members to serve as cochairperson of the committee. 2. Two members of the senate natural resources committee who are not members of the same political party and who are appointed by the president of the senate.  The president of the senate shall designate one of these members to serve as cochairperson of the committee. 3. The director of the department of environmental quality or the director's designee. 4. One member who represents the interests of environmental nongovernmental entities in this state and who is appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives. 5. One member who represents the interests of citizens' rights nongovernmental entities in this state and who is appointed by the president of the senate. 6. One member who represents industrial interests in this state and who is appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives. 7. One member who represents solid waste or hazardous waste facilities in this state and who is appointed by the president of the senate. B. Committee members are not eligible to receive compensation but are eligible for reimbursement of expenses under title 38, chapter 4, article 2, Arizona Revised Statutes. C. The committee shall meet to consider and collect information on the need for a citizen suit provision in this state's solid waste and hazardous waste statutes.  On or before December 31, 2026, the committee shall submit a report of its findings to the governor, the speaker of the house of representatives and the president of the senate and provide a copy of this report to the secretary of state. D. This section is repealed from and after June 30, 2027.